District of Columbia statutes.
31-1131.17

Reporting of actions.

(a)

An insurance producer shall report to the Commissioner any administrative action taken against the insurance producer in another jurisdiction or by another governmental agency in the District within 30 days of the final disposition of the matter. The report shall include a copy of the order, consent to order, or other relevant legal documents.

(b)

Within 30 days of the initial pretrial hearing date, an insurance producer shall report to the Commissioner any criminal prosecution of the insurance producer taken in any jurisdiction. The report shall include a copy of the initial complaint filed, the order resulting from the hearing, and any other relevant legal documents.

History

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 17, 50 DCR 260